Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska12-809
Abandoned and neglected pioneer cemeteries; maintenance.

Care given to such cemetery by a county under sections 12-807 to 12-810 may include the removal of shrubbery, trees, or brush, the erection of adequate fences, the planting of grass, flowers, trees, and shrubbery, repair and uprighting of tombstones and gravemarkers, and any other care normally accorded to cemeteries.

Laws 1975, LB 129, § 3;

Laws 1996, LB 932, § 3.